Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.560

Defense to action for injury caused by indoor air pollutants.

It is a defense in a civil action brought for damages for injury caused by indoor air pollutants in a residential structure on which construction was begun on or after July 1, 1991, that the builder or design professional complied in good faith, without negligence or misconduct, with:

(1) Building product safety standards, including labeling;

(2) Restrictions on the use of building materials known or believed to contain substances that contribute to indoor air pollution; and

(3) The ventilation and radon resistive construction requirements adopted under RCW 19.27.190.

[ 1992 c 132 s 2; 1990 c 2 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—1990 c 2: See note following RCW 19.27.040.

Findings—Severability—1990 c 2: See notes following RCW 19.27A.015.